Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 1 Appointment and Acceptance

53-12-200.
Capacity of trustee.

A trustee shall have legal capacity under Georgia law to acquire, hold, and transfer title to property. An individual shall be eligible to serve as a trustee regardless of citizenship or residency. If the trustee is a corporation, partnership, or other entity, it shall be required to have the power to act as a trustee in Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-200

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-201.
Appointment and vacancies.

A settlor may appoint trustees or grant that power to others, including trust beneficiaries.

A trust shall never fail for want of a trustee.

If the trust instrument names a person to fill a vacancy or provides a method of appointing a trustee, any vacancy shall be filled or appointment made as provided in the trust instrument.

The qualified beneficiaries may appoint a trustee by unanimous consent.

In all other cases, the court, on petition of an interested person, may appoint any number of trustees consistent with the intention of the settlor and the interests of the beneficiaries.

The petition provided for in subsection (e) of this Code section shall be served upon all qualified beneficiaries.

A trustee appointed as a successor trustee shall have all the authority of the original trustee.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-201

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 551, § 10/SB 134; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 14/HB 121.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

53-12-202.
Acceptance.

The acceptance of a trust shall be necessary to constitute a person as trustee. Acceptance may be effected by acts as well as words. After acceptance, the trustee shall not decline the trusteeship.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, a person designated as trustee accepts the trusteeship:

By substantially complying with a method of acceptance provided in the trust instrument; or

If the trust instrument does not provide a method or the method provided in the trust instrument is not expressly made exclusive, by accepting delivery of the trust property, exercising powers or performing duties as trustee, or otherwise indicating acceptance of the trusteeship.

A person designated as trustee, without accepting the trusteeship, may act to preserve the trust property if, as soon as practicable, the person rejects or declines the trusteeship.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-202

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-203.
Trustee’s bond.

A trustee shall not be required to give a bond to secure performance of the trustee’s duties unless:

The trust instrument requires a bond; or

A bond is found by the court to be necessary to protect the interests of beneficiaries or creditors of the trust, even though the trust instrument waives the requirement of a bond.

Even though a bond has been required pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section or the trust instrument requires a bond, the court may excuse the requirement, reduce or increase the amount of a bond, release a surety, or permit the substitution of another bond with the same or different sureties.

The cost of any bond shall be charged against the trust.

If a bond is required, the bond shall be:

Secured by an individual who is a domiciliary of this state or by a licensed commercial surety authorized to transact business in this state;

Payable to the court for the benefit of interested persons as their interests may appear;

Conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the trustee’s duties; and

If imposed by the court, in an amount and with sureties and liabilities as required by the court.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary:

A financial institution, trust company, national or state bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association described in Code Section 7-1-242 that seeks to serve as a trustee under any trust created under or governed by the laws of this state shall not be required to give bond for the faithful performance of its duties unless its combined capital, surplus, and undivided profits are less than $3 million as reflected in its last statement filed with the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States or the commissioner of banking and finance; and

In every case in which the trustee of any trust is required to give bond for the faithful performance of the trustee’s duties in such fiduciary capacity, the bond shall be in a value equal to double the value of the trust estate; provided, however, that the trustee may give bond in an amount equal to the value of the trust estate if the bond is secured by a licensed commercial surety authorized to transact business in this state. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “trust estate” shall exclude real property and improvements thereon held by the trustee in a fiduciary capacity; provided, however, that upon the conversion of any such real property into personalty, the trustee shall give a new bond including the value of the personalty into which the real property has been converted.

The trustee and any surety shall be held and deemed joint and several obligors and may be subjected jointly and severally to liability in the same action. No prior judgment establishing the liability of the trustee shall be necessary before an action is brought against the sureties on the bond.

When a judgment has been obtained against the principal and surety or sureties on the bond of a trustee, a levy may be made upon any property of any defendant in fi. fa.

A court of competent jurisdiction shall be authorized to enter a judgment and to issue a writ of execution against the principal and surety on the bond of a trustee and shall be further authorized to grant judgment and execution in favor of the surety against the principal upon payment of the judgment by the surety.

Failure to comply with this Code section shall not make void or voidable or otherwise affect an act or transaction of a trustee with any third party.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-204.
Cotrustees generally.

The authority of cotrustees to act on behalf of the trust shall be as follows:

A power vested in two or more trustees shall only be exercised by their unanimous action; provided, however, that a cotrustee may delegate to one or more other cotrustees the performance of ministerial acts;

If a vacancy occurs in the office of a cotrustee, the remaining cotrustee or cotrustees may act unless or until the vacancy is filled; and

While a cotrustee is unable to act because of inaccessibility, illness, or other temporary incapacity, the remaining cotrustee or cotrustees may act as if they were the only trustees when necessary to accomplish the purposes of the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.